District of Columbia statutes.
32-1612.01

Reference.

(a)

Except as otherwise specified, a reference in this subchapter to a section or provision of the Workforce Investment Act of 1998, approved August 7, 1998 (112 Stat. 936; 29 U.S.C. § 2822), shall be deemed to be a reference to the corresponding provision of the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act, approved July 22, 2014 (Pub. L. No 113-128; 128 Stat. 1425).

(b)

This section shall apply as of July 22, 1014 [2014].

July 18, 2000, D.C. Law 13-150, § 13a
as added May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-263, § 2(n), 62 DCR 1518